Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 14
UNIFORM MANDATORY DISPOSITION
OF DETAINERS ACT

Section

16-14-101. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Uniform Mandatory Disposition of Detainers Act".

Source:

L. 69:

p. 292, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-23-8.

16-14-102. Request for disposition of untried complaint or information.

Any person who is in the custody of the department of corrections pursuant to section 16-11-301 or parts 8 and 9 of article 1.3 of title 18, C.R.S., may request final disposition of any untried indictment, information, or criminal complaint pending against him in this state. The request shall be in writing addressed to the court in which the indictment, information, or criminal complaint is pending and to the prosecuting official charged with the duty of prosecuting it and shall set forth the place of confinement.

It is the duty of the superintendent of the institution where the prisoner is confined to promptly inform each prisoner, in writing, of the source and nature of any untried indictment, information, or criminal complaint against him of which the superintendent has knowledge, and of the prisoner's right to make a request for final disposition thereof.

Failure of the superintendent of the institution where the prisoner is confined to inform a prisoner, as required by subsection (2) of this section, within one year after a detainer from this state has been filed with the institution where the prisoner is confined shall entitle the prisoner to a dismissal with prejudice of the indictment, information, or criminal complaint.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 291, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-23-1.

L. 76:

(2) and (3) amended, p. 532, § 7, effective April 9.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 902, § 6, effective August 1.

16-14-103. Duties of superintendent upon delivery of request.

Any request made pursuant to section 16-14-102 shall be delivered to the superintendent where the prisoner is confined who shall forthwith:

Certify the term of commitment under which the prisoner is being held, the time already served on the sentence, the time remaining to be served, the earned time earned, the time of parole eligibility of the prisoner, and any decisions of the state board of parole relating to the prisoner; and

Send, by registered mail, a copy of the request made by the prisoner and a copy of the information certified under paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) to both the court having jurisdiction of the untried offense and to the prosecuting official charged with the duty of prosecuting the offense.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 291, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-23-2.

L. 76:

IP(1) amended, p. 532, § 8, effective April 9.

L. 90:

(1)(a) amended, p. 954, § 21, effective June 7.

Cross references:

For provisions concerning good time and parole, see article 22.5 of title 17.

16-14-104. Trial or dismissal.

Within one hundred eighty-two days after the receipt of the request by the court and the prosecuting official, or within such additional time as the court for good cause shown in open court may grant, the prisoner or the prisoner's counsel being present, the indictment, information, or criminal complaint shall be brought to trial; but the parties may stipulate for a continuance or a continuance may be granted on notice to the prisoner's attorney and opportunity to be heard. If, after such a request, the indictment, information, or criminal complaint is not brought to trial within that period, no court of this state shall any longer have jurisdiction thereof, nor shall the untried indictment, information, or criminal complaint be of any further force or effect, and the court shall dismiss it with prejudice.

Any prisoner who requests disposition pursuant to section 16-14-102 may waive the right to disposition within the time specified in subsection (1) of this section by express waiver on the record after full advisement by the court. If a prisoner makes said waiver, the time for trial of the indictment, information, or criminal complaint shall be extended as provided in section 18-1-405 (4), C.R.S., concerning waiver of the right to speedy trial.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 291, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-23-3.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 463, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1377, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(1) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 859, § 94, effective July 1.

16-14-105. Escape voids request.

Escape from custody by any prisoner subsequent to his execution of a request for final disposition of an untried indictment, information, or criminal complaint shall void the request.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 292, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-23-4.

16-14-106. Article does not apply.

The provisions of this article do not apply to any person determined to be mentally incompetent by a court of competent jurisdiction.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 292, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-23-5.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 926, § 27, effective July 1.

16-14-107. Prisoners to be informed of provisions of article.

The superintendent shall arrange for all prisoners under his care and control to be informed in writing of the provisions of this article and for a record thereof to be placed in each prisoner's file.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 292, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-23-6.

L. 76:

Entire section amended, p. 532, § 9, effective April 9.

16-14-108. Construction of article.

This article shall be so construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact it.

Source:

L. 69:

p. 292, § 8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-23-7.